Utah statutes.
63B-3-106.   Constitutional debt limitation.
(1)  The commission may not issue bonds under this chapter in an amount that
violates the limitation described in Article XIV, Sec. 1, Utah Constitution.
(2)  For purposes of applying the debt limitation contained in Article XIV,
Sec. 1, Utah Constitution, the value of the taxable property in Utah is
considered to be 100% of the fair market value of the taxable property of the
state, as computed from the last assessment for state purposes previous to the
issuance of the bonds.
